Idaho, session 2026, H0536.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 25-2601, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
25-2601. CONTROL OF PESTS -- POWERS OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS. The
board of county commissioners of each and every county of this state are
all hereby granted full power and authority to declare any predatory ani-
mal, including coyote, that feeds upon, preys upon or destroys any poultry
or livestock of any kind upon any public or private lands within their re-
spective counties, or any rodent, jack-rabbit, gopher, ground squirrel,
cricket, locust, grasshopper and other insect pests or plant disease causing
organisms/agents or any other invertebrate organism that feeds, preys upon,
or destroys any livestock, natural grasses, or cultivated crops of any kind
upon any public or private lands within their respective counties, of the
following to be agricultural pests, and to take all steps that they may deem
necessary to control such pests.:
(1) Any predatory animal, including coyote, that feeds on, preys on, or
destroys any poultry or livestock on any public or private lands within their
respective counties;
(2) Any rodent, including but not limited to mice, gophers, ground
squirrels, or rats, such as the Norway rat and roof rat; any rabbits or hares;
or any other mammal that feeds on, preys on, or destroys poultry or livestock
operations, natural grasses, cultivated crops of any kind, or the earth on
any public or private lands within their respective counties;
(3) Any insect, including but not limited to crickets, locusts, and
grasshoppers, or any other invertebrate organism that feeds on, preys on,
or destroys poultry or livestock operations, natural grasses, cultivated
crops of any kind, or the earth on any public or private lands within their
respective counties; and
(4) Any plant disease-causing organism or agent that feeds on, preys
on, or destroys poultry or livestock operations, natural grasses, culti-
vated crops of any kind, or the earth on any public or private lands within
their respective counties.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.